Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska3-509
Airport authority; obligations of authority; limited liability.

The bonds, notes, and other obligations of an authority shall not be a debt of the State of Nebraska or of the city in which such authority is established, and neither the state nor the city shall be liable thereon, nor shall such bonds be payable out of any funds other than funds of the authority issuing same.

Laws 1957, c. 9, § 9, p. 123.

City is not liable for debts or other obligations of airport authority which it creates. Lock v. City of Imperial, 182 Neb. 526, 155 N.W.2d 924 (1968).

Issuance of bonds was not unlawful because of this section. Obitz v. Airport Authority of City of Red Cloud, 181 Neb. 410, 149 N.W.2d 105 (1967).